Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-240.09
School lands; control of noxious weeds; contract authorized.

The Board of Educational Lands and Funds shall have the power to contract with supervisors of weed eradication districts of this state or any private or commercial weed control service for the purpose of controlling noxious weeds on school lands.

Laws 1965, c. 427, § 1, p. 1366;

Laws 1978, LB 460, § 3.